Tennessee, session 114, SB2218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-84-715(6), is amended by deleting
the subdivision and substituting:
(6) A statement of the infrastructure and infrastructure costs authorized to be
funded with special assessment revenues within the district, including an itemization of
the funded costs for infrastructure related to each utility service that will serve the
development district;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2218
012367
- 1 -